New Mexico, session 2026, SB83.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One million nine hundred thirty-seven thousand dollars ($1,937,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the board of regents of the university of New Mexico for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for the university of New Mexico's accelerating resilience innovations in drylands institute to be used in cooperation with the university's natural heritage New Mexico: for ecological monitoring of New Mexico's air, land and water; to continue developing a technologically advanced statewide ecological monitoring network with modeling and artificial intelligence solutions to diagnose and predict vulnerabilities in New Mexico's ecosystems, including fire risk; to develop resilience strategies for the sustainable management of air, land and water; to continue programs that foster cooperation between the university of New Mexico and kindergarten through twelfth grade students enrolled in the science, technology, engineering and math programs; and to enhance tribal engagement with research at the university of New Mexico. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -